Utah, session 2026, SB199.
Section 1. Section 31A-22-304 is amended to read:31A-22-304. Motor vehicle liability policy minimum limits.(1)A policy issued or renewed on or before December 31, 2024, containing motor vehicle liability coverage may not limit the insurer's liability under that coverage below the following:(a)(i)$25,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of one personindividual, arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one accident;(ii)subject to the limit for one personindividual in Subsection (1)(a)(i), in the amount of $65,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of two or more personsindividuals arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one accident; and(iii)in the amount of $15,000 because of liability for injury to, or destruction of, property of others arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one accident; or(b)$80,000 in any one accident whether arising from bodily injury to or the death of others, or from destruction of, or damage to, the property of others.(2)Subject to Subsection (3), a policy issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, containing motor vehicle liability coverage may not limit the insurer's liability under that coverage below the following:(a)(i)$30,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of one person, one individual or to each heir as described in Section 78B-3-105 for the death of one individual, arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one an accident;(ii)subject to the limit for one person individual in Subsection (2)(a)(i), in the amount of $65,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of two or more persons individuals arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one an accident; and(iii)in the amount of $25,000 because of liability for injury to, or destruction of, property of others arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one an accident; or(b)$90,000 in any onean accident whether arising from bodily injury to or the death of others, or from destruction of, or damage to, the property of others.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection (2), for a policy for a self-insured, private rental fleet, the policy containing motor vehicle liability coverage may not limit the insurer's liability under that coverage below the following:(a)(i)$25,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of one personone individual or to each heir as described in Section 78B-3-105 for the death of one individual, arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any onean accident;(ii)subject to the limit for one person individual in Subsection (3)(a)(i), in the amount of $65,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of two or more persons individuals arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any onean accident; and(iii)in the amount of $15,000 because of liability for injury to, or destruction of, property of others arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any onean accident; or(b)$80,000 in any onean accident whether arising from bodily injury to or the death of others, or from destruction of, or damage to, the property of others.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.